Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Chapter 11

Guardianships and Conservatorships Generally [Transferred]

34-11-101 — 34-11-131.
[Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 11, §§34-11-101 —34-11-131, concerning guardianships and conservatorships generally, was transferred to chapter 1 of this title as §§34-1-101 —34-1-131 in 2001.